Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 2. Fish

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d Fish and Game § 53.

36A C.J.S. Fish § 36.

§ 23-2-201.
Fees; restrictions; verification of residency required.

Any qualified person may purchase a fishing license from the department or its authorized selling agents. Purchase of a license entitles the licensee to take any fish of Wyoming at the time, in a place, in a manner and in an amount as provided by law and the orders of the commission. At the time of application for a resident license under this section, the applicant shall provide a valid Wyoming driver’s license or a copy thereof, or other proof of residency. The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations stating what proof of residency is required so that only bona fide Wyoming residents, as defined in W.S. 23-1-102(a)(ix), receive resident licenses. For purposes of purchasing a lifetime resident license under subsection (d) of this section and except for the resident disabled veteran’s lifetime license issued under subsection (f) of this section, an applicant shall have been a resident as defined in W.S. 23-1-102(a)(ix) continuously for a ten (10) year period immediately preceding the application date.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 92, § 2.

In addition to other fees under this section, persons purchasing a fishing license under this section may pay a voluntary fee of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount to fund search and rescue activities in the state. The department shall provide information on the license form that the purchaser may pay the fee under this subsection to be credited to the search and rescue account. Any voluntary fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the search and rescue account created by W.S. 19-13-301(a).

The following fishing licenses may be purchased for the fee indicated in addition to the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

and subject to the limitations provided:

Resident fishing license . . . . . $25.00

Nonresident fishing license . . . . . $100.00

Nonresident youth fishing license . . . . . $15.00

Resident youth fishing license (between their 14th and 18th birthdays) . . . . . $3.00

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 27, § 2.

Nonresident daily fishing license . . . . . $12.00

Resident daily fishing license . . . . . $4.00

Resident lifetime fishing license . . . . . $309.00

Nonresident five (5) consecutive day fishing license . . . . . $54.00

In addition to other fees under this section, persons applying for a license or tag under this section may pay any whole dollar amount to fund the purchase of access easements by the commission to provide access to public and private lands.

Any resident disabled veteran who receives fifty percent (50%) or more service connected disability compensation from the United States department of veteran’s affairs may apply to the department for a resident disabled veteran’s lifetime fishing license. The license entitles the resident disabled veteran to take any fish within Wyoming at the time, in a place, in a manner and in an amount as provided by law and the orders of the commission. Application shall include proof of residency required under subsection (a) of this section, certification of the applicant’s service connected disability and other information required by rule and regulation of the commission. Notwithstanding subsection (a) and paragraph (d)(viii) of this section, a disabled veteran’s lifetime fishing license shall be issued to an eligible applicant without payment of any fee.

Any resident who is on active duty in the United States military deployed to a combat zone who is home on leave may apply to the department for a resident daily fishing license. Application under this section shall include proof of residency required under subsection (a) of this section, certification of the applicant’s active duty deployment to a combat zone and other information required by rule and regulation of the commission. Notwithstanding subsection (a) and paragraph (d)(vi) of this section, a resident daily fishing license issued pursuant to this subsection shall be issued to the eligible applicant without charge. For purposes of this subsection, a combat zone is any area which the president of the United States designates by executive order as an area in which the armed forces of the United States are engaged in combat.

In addition to other fees under this section, persons applying for a license under this section may pay any whole dollar amount to support wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system. The department shall provide information on the application form specifying that the applicant may pay the contribution under this subsection. Funds collected under this subsection shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the wildlife conservation account created by W.S. 31-2-231(b).

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 34; 1943, ch. 112, § 6; 1945, ch. 84, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 47-207; Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; 1949, ch. 90, § 1; 1951, ch. 71, § 1; 1955, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-86; Laws 1959, ch. 196, § 1; 1961, ch. 162, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 132, § 1; ch. 147, § 1; ch. 184, § 3; 1969, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 75, § 1; ch. 129, §§ 8, 9; 1971, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 199, § 1; ch. 233, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-38; Laws 1979, ch. 29, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 166, § 1; 1986, ch. 69, § 1; 1989, ch. 24, § 1; 1991, ch. 254, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 1996, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 121, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 99, § 2; 1999, ch. 26, § 1; ch. 92, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 27, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 71, § 1; ch. 144, § 1; 2004, ch. 36, § 1; 2006, ch. 76, § 1; 2007, ch. 2, § 1; 2013 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 119, § 1, effective January 1, 2018; 2017 ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to deposits into the game and fish fund, see § 23-1-501(d).

The first 2003 amendment by ch. 71, § 1, effective July 1, 2003, inserted “and except for the resident disabled veteran's lifetime license issued under subsection (f) of this section” in the last sentence of (a); and added (f).

The second 2003 amendment by ch. 144, § 2, effective January 1, 2004, substituted “$18.00” for “$15.00” in (d)(i); and substituted “$75.00” for “$65.00” in (d)(ii).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in the section as set out above.

The 2004 amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2005, in (d), inserted “in addition to the applicable fee under W.S.

23-1-701

.”

The 2006 amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective August 1, 2006, added (g).

The 2007 amendments. —

The 2007 amendment, effective January 1, 2008, in (d), changed dollar amounts for license fees in (i), (ii) and (vi) through (viii).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “a voluntary fee of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount” for “one dollar ($1.00)” in the first sentence; and added “voluntary” at the beginning of the last sentence in (c).

The 2017 amendments —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 119, § 1, effective January 1, 2018, added (d)(ix).

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 159, § 1, effective January 1, 2018, in (d)(i), substituted “25.00” for “$22.00”; in (d)(ii), substituted “100.00” for “90.00”; and in (d)(iii), substituted “309.00” for “300.00.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (h).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "$" preceding the dollar values throughout (d).

Law reviews. —

For note including discussion of discrimination against nonresident hunters through license fees, see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability of state fishing license laws to fishing in private lake or pond, 15 ALR2d 754.

§ 23-2-202.
Age restrictions; fishing.

Except as provided by W.S.

23-2-209

, no person fourteen (14) years or older nor any nonresident person less than fourteen (14) years shall fish in or on any Wyoming waters, except a catch-out pond located on a licensed fish hatchery or a fishing preserve, without first obtaining a proper license. A nonresident person less than fourteen (14) years need not obtain a proper fishing license if accompanied by an adult possessing a valid unexpired Wyoming fishing license in which case the nonresident person’s bag limit as established by law or by commission orders shall be applied to and limited by the fishing license held by the adult person in his company.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 30; C.S. 1945, § 47-203; Laws 1949, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-40; Laws 1959, ch. 66, § 1; 1969, ch. 141, § 1; 1971, ch. 192, § 8; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-39; 2003, ch. 48, § 2.

§ 23-2-203.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 121, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 34, related to military fishing licenses.

§§ 23-2-204 and 23-2-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 29, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 34, and Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1, related to girl scout fishing licenses, and special 30-day fishing licenses, respectively.

§ 23-2-206.
Underwater fishing.

The commission may set limits and designate specified waters as being open to underwater spear gun fishing for fish. In specified waters the use of spear guns of types approved by the commission to take fish underwater with or without underwater breathing apparatus is permissible. No game fish may be taken unless the underwater fisherman is completely submerged.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 121, § 3.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-43; Laws 1979, ch. 128, § 1; 1996, ch. 121, § 3.

§ 23-2-207.
Special limited fishing permit for hospitalized veterans, residents of state institutions, court placed children and residents of licensed nursing care facilities; students.

Upon an appropriate form furnished by the appropriate institution or facility as prescribed by rule and regulation of the commission, a special limited fishing permit may be issued without charge by:

Any veterans administration hospital within Wyoming to any hospitalized veteran under its care and supervision, which entitles the hospitalized veteran to fish while under the direct control of the hospital;

The department of health or the department of family services to any resident in the veterans’ home of Wyoming, Wyoming state hospital, Wyoming life resource center, Wyoming boys’ school and the Wyoming girls’ school, which entitles the institutionalized resident to fish while under the direct supervision of the appropriate institution;

Any Wyoming private residential facility or group home to any child who is placed in the facility or home pursuant to court order and who is in either protective or temporary legal custody of the state, which entitles the child to fish only while under the direct control and supervision of the facility or home;

Any nursing care facility as defined by W.S.

35-2-901

(a)(xvi) and licensed under W.S.

35-2-901

through

35-2-910

, to any person under the care and supervision of and residing in the facility, which entitles this person to fish while under the direct control of the facility;

Any Wyoming accredited school, to any enrolled student who is participating in a curriculum based program as described in W.S.

21-9-101

, which entitles the student to fish while under the direct supervision of the school.

The commission may by rule and regulation limit the area within which a special limited fishing permit is valid.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 29, § 1; 1991, ch. 69, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 1; 1995, ch. 22, § 1; 1998, ch. 7, § 1; 2001, ch. 21, § 1; 2008, ch. 85, § 1; 2011, ch. 43, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “life resource center” for “state training school” and “supervision” for “control” in (a)(ii).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(v).

§ 23-2-208.
Landowners fishing generally.

Notwithstanding W.S.

23-2-202

, any individual who owns land wholly containing a lake, pond or ponds which derive their source of water from surface runoff, natural springs or wells may stock the lake, pond or ponds with eggs or fish with the consent and under the supervision of the department or its authorized personnel provided that other game fish regulated by the commission do not occur in the lake, pond or ponds. The individual landowner and the landowner’s spouse, children and grandchildren may fish in the lake, pond or ponds without first obtaining a fishing license. Upon removal from the landowner’s property containing the authorized lake, pond or ponds, the individual landowner shall provide a written statement to the possessor of any fish verifying the number and species of fish caught, kept and removed from such property. The lake, pond or ponds shall be approved by the department pursuant to commission rule and regulation.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 45, § 1.

§ 23-2-209.
Wyoming sport fishing day; fishing exempt from licensure.

The commission may annually designate not more than one (1) day each calendar year as a free sport fishing day. Residents and nonresidents may during the designated free sport fishing day, without payment of any fee and without acquiring a license pursuant to W.S.

23-2-201

or a conservation stamp under W.S.

23-2-306

, exercise the privileges of sport fishing licensees subject to limitations imposed upon licensees by law and commission rule and regulation.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 48, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(v), substituted “W.S.

23-2-306

” for “W.S.

23-3-306

” in the second sentence.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2003, ch. 48, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2003.